src/verb-sje-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no




LEXICON LE

le+V+Ind+Prs: LEPRS ; 
le+V+Ind+Prt: LEPRT ; 
le+V+Ind+Pot: LEPOT ;
le+V+PrfPrc:lam # ;

LEXICON LEPRS
+Sg1:läv # ; 
+Sg1:lev # ; 
+Sg2:lä # ;  
+Sg3:lä # ; 
+Sg3:le # ; 
+Du1:lin # ; 
+Du1:len # ; 
+Du2:lihpen # ; 
+Du2:lähpen # ;  
+Du3:läbá # ; 
+Pl1:läp # ; 
+Pl1:lip # ; 
+Pl1:lep # ; 
+Pl2:lihpit # ; 
+Pl2:lehpit # ; 
+Pl3:lin # ; 
+Pl3:lä # ;

LEXICON LEPRT
+Sg1:lijjiv    # ; 
+Sg1:lijiv    # ;  
+Sg2:lijji    # ; 
+Sg2:liji    # ;  
+Sg3:lij    # ; 
+Du1:lijmen # ; 
+Du1:lijmin # ; 
+Du2:lijden # ; 
+Du3:lijga # ; 
+Pl1:lijme # ; 
+Pl2:lijde # ; 
+Pl3:lidjin    # ;  
+Pl3:lijjin    # ; 
+Pl3:lin    # ; 

LEXICON LEPOT
+Sg1:litjav # ; 
+Sg2:litjah # ; 
+Sg3:litj # ; 
+Du1:litjin # ; 
+Du2:litjapiehtien # ; 
+Du3:litjapah # ; 
+Du3:litjapan # ; 
+Pl1:litjap # ; 
+Pl2:litjapiht # ; 
+Pl2:litjapihtit # ; 
+Pl3:litjih # ; 


LEXICON ATJA
atja+V+Ind+Prs: ATJAPRS ; 
atja+V+Ind+Prt: ATJAPRT ; 


LEXICON ATJAPRS
+Sg1:atjav      # ; 
+Sg2:atjah      # ; 
+Sg3:atja       # ; 
+Du1:itjin      # ; 
+Du2:atjabihten # ; 
+Du3:atjaba     # ; 
+Pl1:atjap      # ; 
+Pl2:atjabihtit # ; 
+Pl3:itjih      # ; 

LEXICON ATJAPRT
+Sg1:itjiv    # ; 
+Sg2:itjih    # ; 
+Sg3:atjaj    # ; 
+Du1:atjajmen # ; 
+Du2:atjajden # ; 
+Du3:atjajgan # ; 
+Pl1:atjajmeh # ; 
+Pl2:atjajdeh # ; 
+Pl3:itjin    # ; 

LEXICON IJ
+V+Neg+Prs: IJPRS ;
+V+Neg+Prt: IJPRT ;
+V+Neg+Imprt: IJIMP ;
+V+Neg+Opt: IJOPT ;

LEXICON IJPRS
+Sg1:iv    # ; 
+Sg2:ih    # ; 
+Sg3:ij    # ; 
+Du1:ien # ; 
+Du2:iehpien # ; 
+Du2:ehpien # ; 
+Du2:ihpien # ; 
+Du3:iepá # ; 
+Du3:iepán # ; 
+Pl1:iehp # ; 
+Pl1:iep # ; 
+Pl2:iehpit # ; 
+Pl2:ihpit # ; 
+Pl3:ieh   # ; 

LEXICON IJPRT
+Sg1:ittjiv    # ; 
+Sg2:ittjih    # ; 
+Sg3:ittjij    # ; 
+Du1:iejmien # ; 
+Du1:ittjijmen # ; 
+Du2:iejtien # ; 
+Du2:ittjijtien # ; 
+Du3:iejkán # ; 
+Du3:ittjijká # ; 
+Pl1:iejmieh # ; 
+Pl1:ittjijmeh # ; 
+Pl2:iejtieh # ; 
+Pl2:ittjijteh # ; 
+Pl3:ittjin    # ; 

LEXICON IJIMP
+Sg2:ielieh  # ;
+Du2:iellien # ; 
+Du3:iellit  # ;
                        
LEXICON IJOPT                      
+Sg1:alluv    # ;
+Sg2:alluh    # ;
+Sg3:allus    # ;
+Du1:iellun   # ;
+Du1:allun    # ;
+Du2:ielluten # ;
+Du2:alluten  # ;
+Du3:ielluska # ;
+Du3:alluska  # ;
+Pl1:iellup   # ;
+Pl1:allup    # ;
+Pl2:ielluteh # ;
+Pl2:alluteh  # ;
+Pl3:ielluseh # ;
+Pl3:alluseh  # ;



LEXICON Verb

 LE "vara" ;

 ATJA "skola" ; 
 IJ "inte" ;

nammadit:nammad2 NAMMADIT "kalla någon vid namn" ; 

båhtet:båht BÅHTET "komma" ; ! JL ie

vuoddjat:vuoddj BALLAT ; ! JL a
mannat:mann BALLAT ; 

vuällget:vuällg BÅHTET ; 
båhttjet:båhttj BÅHTET ; 
basset:bass BÅHTET ; 

släddjit:släddji V_CONTR ; 
málestit:málest2 NAMMADIT ; 

jåhkot:jåhk ÅRROT ; ! JL uo
bårrot:bårr ÅRROT ; 

vessot:vess VESSOT "leva, må" ;

årrot:årr ÅRROT "bo, vara" ;



! -----------


!bal&#8217;lát:bal&#8217;lát "bli rädd" ; 
!bal’lát:bal’lát "bli rädd" ; 
!gur&#8217;rit:gur&#8217;ri V_CONTR "klättra" ; 
!gur’rit:gur’ri V_CONTR "klättra" ; 
!tsábmestuvvut:tsábmestuvvut  "v bli slagen" ; 

adnalit:adnal NAMMADIT "greppa" ; 
adnet:adn BÅHTET "n ha, äga (inij han hade, ägde)" ;
ájttsat:ájtts BALLAT " jts upptäcka" ;
állget:állg BÅHTET "lg börja (äddne älgij mor började)" ;
balkestit:balkest2 NAMMADIT "kasta" ; 
ballat:ball BALLAT "l  vara rädd" ;
basset:bass BÅHTET "s steka" ;
biehttot:biehtt ÅRROT "ht förmana, avråda"  ; 
biejjat:biejj BALLAT "j sätta, lägga, ställa" ;
bieljeduhtet:bieljeduht BÅHTET "ht  göra döv" ;
bivddet:bivdd BÅHTET "vd fånga, jaga, fiska" ;
bruvkkut:bruvkku V_CONTR "bruka, ha för vana (bruvkkujin dahkat de brukade göra)" ; 
bulligåhtet:bulligåht BÅHTET "d börja brinna" ;
buollet:buoll BÅHTET "l  brinna" ;
bádjat:bádj BALLAT "j låta" ;
báhtarit:báhtar NAMMADIT "fly" ; 
báhtset:báhts BÅHTET "ts stanna, bli kvar (härgge bätsij härken stannade)" ;
bájttet:bájtt BÅHTET "jt skina" ;
bállet:báll BÅHTET "l gräva" ;
bähttet:bähtt BÅHTET "ht  lura" ;
båhtet:båht BÅHTET "d  komma" ;
båhtjet:båhtj BÅHTET "tj mjölka" ;
dahkat:dahk BALLAT "g göra, tillverka" ;
dibddet:dibdd BÅHTET " bd låta" ;
didnadit:didnad2 NAMMADIT "skrika, ropa" ; 
diehtet:dieht BÅHTET "d veta" ;
dulvvit:dulvvi V_CONTR "få högvatten"  ; 
durrut:durru V_CONTR "börja strida" ; 
dádjadit:dádjad2 NAMMADIT "förstå" ;
dárbahit:dárbah2 NAMMADIT "behöva" ; 
dåbddåt:dåbdd LÅHKÅT "bd känna, känna igen" ; 
fierrat:fierr BALLAT "r drunkna" ;
färrut:färru V_CONTR "fara" ; 
gahtjat:gahtj BALLAT "tj fråga" ;
gallgat:gallg BALLAT "skall (verb)" ;
gatjadit:gatjad2 NAMMADIT "fråga" ; 
gijttalit:gijttal NAMMADIT "tacka" ; 
gilljot:gillj ÅRROT "lj skrika, gassta"  ; 
grävvit:grävvi V_CONTR "begrava"  ; 
gullat:gull BALLAT "l höra" ;
gulldalit:gulldal NAMMADIT "lyssna" ; 
guohtot:guoht ÅRROT "d beta"  ; 
guohtsalit:guohtsal NAMMADIT "springa (om fyrfota djur)" ; 
guohtsat:guohts BALLAT "ts klättra" ;
guovllat:guovll BALLAT "vl titta, kika" ;
gáhtot:gáht ÅRROT "d försvinna"  ; 
gállet:gáll BÅHTET "l vada" ;
gávdnat:gávdn BALLAT "dn hitta, finna" ;
gávnadit:gávnad2 NAMMADIT "träffas" ; 
gävdnut:gävdnu V_CONTR "finnas" ; 
gåhtjoduvvat:gåhtjoduvvat BALLAT "v kallas" ;
gåhttjot:gåhttj ÅRROT "htj kalla, benämna"  ; 
habsádallat:habsádall BALLAT "l  lukta" ;
håhkkånit:håhkkån NAMMADIT "dö" ; 
hållåt:håll LÅHKÅT "l säga" ; 
jahttet:jahtt BÅHTET "ht säga" ;
juojgadit:juojgad2 NAMMADIT "jojka något eller någon?" ;
juajggat:juajgg BALLAT "jg jojka" ;
jábmet:jábm BÅHTET "m dö" ;
jáhkket:jáhkk BÅHTET "hk tro" ;
jávestit:jávest2 NAMMADIT "täcka över med jord" ; 
jåhtet:jåht BÅHTET "d flytta" ;
jårgedit:jårged2 NAMMADIT "vända sig" ; 
lieradit:lierad2 NAMMADIT "lära ut, undervisa" ; 
lierrat:lierr BALLAT "r lära sig" ;
lierrit:lierri V_CONTR "lära sig"  ; 
livudahttet:livudahtt BÅHTET "ht få att vila" ;
livvadit:livvad2 NAMMADIT "ligga och vila (om djur)" ; 
lávllot:lávll ÅRROT "vl sjunga"  ; 
láđđat:láđđ BALLAT "đ anfalla" ;
lägit:lägi V_CONTR "laga"  ; 
lågådit:lågåd2 NAMMADIT "låta någon läsa" ; 
låhkågåhtet:låhkågåht BÅHTET "d  börja läsa" ;
låhkåt:låhk LÅHKÅT "g läsa" ; 
mannat:mann BALLAT "n gå, fara" ;
máhttet:máhtt BÅHTET "ht kunna" ;
mujttalit:mujttal NAMMADIT "berätta" ; 
mujttát:mujttá V_CONTR "komma ihåg" ;
mujttet:mujtt BÅHTET "jt minnas" ; 
njuovvat:njuovv BALLAT "v flå" ;
närridallat:närridall BALLAT "l  bli retad" ;
närrit:närri V_CONTR "retas"  ; 
nåjddot:nåjdd ÅRROT "jd göra nåjdkonster (sija nujddun de gjorde nåjdkonster)"  ; 
rekknut:rekknu V_CONTR "räkna" ; 
riegádit:riegád2 NAMMADIT "födas" ; 
ruojadit:ruojad2 NAMMADIT "skrika, vråla" ;
räjdnuhit:räjdnuh2 NAMMADIT "valla renar" ; 
råggåstit:råggåst2 NAMMADIT "rycka upp, bända upp" ; 
råhkat:råhk BALLAT "be" ;
råhkålit:råhkål NAMMADIT "be" ; 
råhkåstallat:råhkåstall BALLAT "l tillbedja" ;
råhkåt:råhk LÅHKÅT "g be en bön" ; 
sihtat:siht BALLAT "d  vilja" ;
sjaddat:sjadd BALLAT "dd bli, växa" ;
sjivnnjedit:sjivnnjed2 NAMMADIT "(religiös) skapa" ; 
skáladit:skálad2 NAMMADIT "stångas (om kämpande rentjurar vid brunst)" ; 
skånårdit:skånård2 NAMMADIT "beta i lugn och ro" ; 
slábmat:slábm BALLAT "m falla ihop" ;
stivrrit:stivrri V_CONTR "styra"  ; 
stávadit:stávad2 NAMMADIT "stava" ; 
subtsastallat:subtsastall BALLAT "l  berätta" ;
subtsastit:subtsast2 NAMMADIT "berätta" ; 
sviŋgodit:sviŋgod2 NAMMADIT "röra sig (om träd)" ; 
sviŋŋgat:sviŋŋg BALLAT "ŋg röra sig (om träd)" ;
sviŋŋgájdallat:sviŋŋgájdall BALLAT "l röra sig (om träd)" ;
svärrut:svärru V_CONTR "svara" ; 
sáŋardit:sáŋard2 NAMMADIT "sakna" ; 
såggot:sågg ÅRROT "gg dö, omkomma"  ; 
såjttet:såjtt BÅHTET "jt  råka (inträffa)" ;
tjassket:tjassk BÅHTET "sk kasta" ;
tjuggit:tjuggi V_CONTR "sticka"  ; 
tjuhkkit:tjuhkki V_CONTR "samla, föra ihop"  ; 
tjuodtjot:tjuodtj ÅRROT "dtj stå"  ; 
tjuojggat:tjuojgg BALLAT "jg åka skidor" ;
tjágŋat:tjágŋ BALLAT "ŋ krypa in" ;
tjáhtjet:tjáhtj BÅHTET "tj peka med fingret" ;
tjállet:tjáll BÅHTET "l skriva" ;
tjátjástallat:tjátjástall BALLAT "l peka med fingret" ;
tjågget:tjågg BÅHTET "gg samla" ;
tjåhkkåhit:tjåhkkåh2 NAMMADIT "sitta" ; 
tsábmestit:tsábmest2 NAMMADIT "slå ner" ; 
usjudit:usjud2 NAMMADIT "tänka" ; 
vaddet:vadd BÅHTET "dd ge" ;
verttit:vertti V_CONTR "vara tvungen"  ; 
viehkedit:viehked2 NAMMADIT "hjälpa" ; 
vierrodallat:vierrodall BALLAT "l offra" ;
vierrodit:vierrod2 NAMMADIT "offra" ; 
viessot:viess ÅRROT "s leva, må"  ; 
vuäjdnet:vuäjdn BÅHTET "jn se, titta" ;
vuällget:vuällg BÅHTET "l fara" ;
vurkkit:vurkki V_CONTR "gömma undan"  ; 
vádtset:vádts BÅHTET "dts  gå" ;
vádtsát:vádtsá V_CONTR "börja gå" ; ! contr á
vágodit:vágod2 NAMMADIT "förmana, varna" ; 
válldet:válld BÅHTET "ld ta" ;
vásset:váss BÅHTET "s passera" ;
vásstedit:vássted2 NAMMADIT "svara" ; 
vädtjat:vädtj BALLAT "dtj hämta" ;
ådtjot:ådtj ÅRROT "dtj få"  ; 
åhtsålit:åhtsål NAMMADIT "sakna" ; 
åsestit:åsest2 NAMMADIT "handla" ; 
åđđájit:åđđáj NAMMADIT "somna" ; 
åđđát:åđđá V_CONTR "somna" ; 
nuggdat:nuggd BALLAT ; 
slammgat:slammg BALLAT ; 
ábbjat:ábbj BALLAT ; 
ábjjat:ábjj BALLAT ; 
tjäkktjat:tjäkktj BALLAT ; 
gåbttjat:gåbttj BALLAT ; 
gahttjat:gahttj BALLAT ; 
gahttjat:gahttj BALLAT ; 
gåpttjat:gåpttj BALLAT ; 
njisskat:njissk BALLAT ; 
bualdnat:bualdn BALLAT ; 
buollnat:buolln BALLAT ; 
gahppat:gahpp BALLAT ; 
gahppat:gahpp BALLAT ; 
gáhppat:gáhpp BALLAT ; 
gassŋat:gassŋ BALLAT ; 
oadet:oade BÅHTET ; 
åddet:ådde BÅHTET ; 
gåddet:gådde BÅHTET ; 
gåddet:gådde BÅHTET ; 
balldet:ballde BÅHTET ; 
bivvdet:bivvde BÅHTET ; 
gåŋŋiet:gåŋŋie BÅHTET ; 
tsabbmet:tsabbme BÅHTET ; 
vuojnnet:vuojnne BÅHTET ; 
gåppset:gåppse BÅHTET ; 
gåppset:gåppse BÅHTET ; 
gåpsset:gåpsse BÅHTET ; 
åhtset:åhtse BÅHTET ; 
åhtset:åhtse BÅHTET ; 
nihtet:nihte BÅHTET ; 
luäjjtet:luäjjte BÅHTET ; 
bäjjstet:bäjjste BÅHTET ; 
beijsstet:beijsste BÅHTET ; 
luojttet:luojtte BÅHTET ; 
luäjttet:luäjtte BÅHTET ; 
åŋŋet:åŋŋe BÅHTET ; 
gibbnjit:gibbnji V_CONTR ;
diŋŋgot:diŋŋgo ÅRROT ; 
buodnjot:buodnjo ÅRROT ; 
bårrsjot:bårrsjo ÅRROT ; 
vilssjot:vilssjo ÅRROT ; 
bårssjot:bårssjo ÅRROT ; 
njissjkot:njissjko ÅRROT ; 
sjvássjkot:sjvássjko ÅRROT ; 
hávsskot:hávssko ÅRROT ; 
såbbtsot:såbbtso ÅRROT ; 
soabttsot:soabttso ÅRROT ; 
agŋot:agŋo ÅRROT ; 
ággŋot:ággŋo ÅRROT ; 
budnjut:budnju V_CONTR ; 
gågglut:gågglu V_CONTR ; 
gåpptjåt:gåpptj LÅHKÅT ;
gåjjkåt:gåjjk LÅHKÅT ;
åhtsåt:åhts LÅHKÅT ;
